Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-223.01
School, defined.

School shall mean (1) any school board or school district and (2) any private for-profit or not-for-profit institution, the primary purpose of which is to provide educational instruction if such institution is available for attendance by members of the general public.

Laws 1989, LB 706, § 6;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 27.